Massachusetts, session 194th, S296.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 3C of chapter 23A, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is 
hereby amended by adding the following 2 subsections:-  
(e) Notwithstanding subsections (b) and (c), the EACC shall, by guideline or regulation, 
establish an incentive program to encourage controlling businesses that locate their global or 
national headquarters and executive operations within the commonwealth to hire and retain new, 
permanent, full-time employees in the commonwealth, provided however that the business shall 
not be required to invest in improvements to receive tax credits as part of the program 
established under this subsection.  

of 2 9  (f) The EACC shall give special consideration to the impact of investment and job growth 
in rural and seasonal communities within the commonwealth. 
SECTION 2. Section 3D of said chapter 23A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
striking out, in line 25, the word "and".  
SECTION 3. Said section 3D of said chapter 23A, as so appearing, is hereby amended by 
inserting after the word "project", in line 29, the following words:- 
; and (viii) preference shall be given by the EACC to a controlling business that already 
bases its global or national headquarters and executive operations within the commonwealth.